Maryland, session 2026, SB0814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Service agreement” means an agreement where a service provider
agrees to provide an individual services for:
(i) The maintenance of residential property that the individual
owns; or
– 1 –

Ch. 738 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The purchase or sale of residential property.
(2) “Service agreement” includes any memorandum, notice, agreement, or
similar document that is used by a service provider to cause a service agreement to be
recorded.
14–902.
(a) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 14–903.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THIS
subtitle applies only to a service agreement entered into on or after June 1, 2023.
14–903.
A service agreement, or any part of a service agreement, may not:
(1) Be effective for more than 1 year; or
(2) (i) Purport to run with the land or bind subsequent bona fide
purchasers;
(ii) Purport to create a lien, encumbrance, or security interest on the
residential property of a party to the service agreement; or
(iii) Allow the service provider to assign or transfer the right to
provide services under the service agreement to another person without notice or the
consent of a party to the service agreement.
14–903.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A SERVICE AGREEMENT WITH A
SERVICE PROVIDER THAT HAS FORFEITED THE RIGHT OF THE SERVICE PROVIDER
TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN THE STATE AND, ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2026, IS DEFUNCT
AND CONSIDERED NOT IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
(B) A SERVICE AGREEMENT, OR ANY PART OF A SERVICE AGREEMENT,
ENTERED INTO BEFORE JUNE 1, 2023, MAY NOT:
(1) BE EFFECTIVE FOR MORE THAN 2 YEARS; OR
(2) (I) PURPORT TO RUN WITH THE LAND OR BIND SUBSEQUENT
BONA FIDE PURCHASERS;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 738
(II) PURPORT TO CREATE A LIEN, ENCUMBRANCE, OR SECURITY
INTEREST ON THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OF A PARTY TO THE SERVICE
AGREEMENT; OR
(III) ALLOW THE SERVICE PROVIDER TO ASSIGN OR TRANSFER
THE RIGHT TO PROVIDE SERVICES UNDER THE SERVICE AGREEMENT TO ANOTHER
PERSON WITHOUT NOTICE OR THE CONSENT OF A PARTY TO THE SERVICE
AGREEMENT.
(C) A SERVICE AGREEMENT, OR ANY PART OF A SERVICE AGREEMENT, THAT
VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSIDERED VOID AND
UNENFORCEABLE.
(D) (1) IF A SERVICE AGREEMENT THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION IS RECORDED, ANY PERSON WITH AN INTEREST IN THE RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO A LIEN ARISING FROM THE SERVICE AGREEMENT
MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST THE SERVICE PROVIDER IN THE CIRCUIT COURT OF
THE COUNTY WHERE THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY IS LOCATED TO REQUEST A
DETERMINATION THAT THE SERVICE AGREEMENT IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PERSON WHO BRINGS AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
SEEK:
(I) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES; AND
(II) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –